New York, session 2025-2026, S10188.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 316 of the laws of 2025, relating to 2 extending the authority of the county of Orange to impose an additional 3 rate of sales and compensating use taxes and provides for the use of the 4 tax funds collected, is REPEALED. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 6 have been in full force and effect on and after January 1, 2026. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15731-02-6